Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-528
Protected series; prohibited acts.

A protected series may not:

(1) be an acquiring, acquired, converting, converted, merging, or surviving organization;

(2) participate in a domestication; or

(3) be a party to or be formed, organized, established, or created in a transaction substantially like a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 29;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 15.